California statutes. Insurance Code
(8) If an issuer makes a written offer to the Medicare supplement policyholders or certificate holders of one or more of its plans, to exchange during a specified period from his or her 1990 standardized plan, as described in Section 10192.9, to a 2010 standardized plan, as described in Section 10192.91, the offer and subsequent exchange shall comply with the following requirements:

(A) An issuer need not provide
 justification to the commissioner if the insured replaces a 1990 standardized policy or certificate with an issue age rated 2010 standardized policy or certificate at the insured’s original issue age and duration. If an insured’s policy or certificate to be replaced is priced on an issue age rate schedule at the time of that offer, the rate charged to the insured for the new exchanged policy shall recognize the policy reserve buildup, due to the prefunding inherent in the use of an issue age rate basis, for the benefit of the insured. The method proposed to be used by an issuer shall be filed with the commissioner.

(B) The rating class of the new policy or certificate shall be the class closest to the insured’s class of the replaced coverage.

(C) An issuer shall not apply new preexisting condition limitations or a new incontestability period to the new policy for those benefits
 contained in the exchanged 1990 standardized policy or certificate of the insured, but may apply preexisting condition limitations of no more than six months to any added benefits contained in the new 2010 standardized policy or certificate not contained in the exchanged policy. This subparagraph shall not apply to an applicant who is guaranteed issue under Section 10192.11 or 10192.12.

(D) The new policy or certificate shall be offered to all policyholders or certificate holders within a given plan, except where the offer or issue would be in violation of state or federal law.

(9) A Medicare supplement policy shall not limit coverage exclusively to a single disease or affliction.

(b) With respect to the standards for basic (core) benefits for benefit plans A to J, inclusive, every issuer shall make available a
 policy or certificate including only the following basic “core” package of benefits to each prospective insured. An issuer may make available to prospective insureds any of the other Medicare supplement insurance benefit plans in addition to the basic core package, but not in lieu of it. However, the benefits described in paragraphs (6) and (7) shall not be offered so long as California is required to disallow these benefits for Medicare beneficiaries by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other agent of the federal government under Section 1395ss of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(1) Coverage of Part A Medicare eligible expenses for hospitalization to the extent not covered by Medicare from the 61st day to the 90th day, inclusive, in any Medicare benefit period.

(2) Coverage of Part A Medicare eligible expenses incurred for hospitalization to the extent not
 covered by Medicare for each Medicare lifetime inpatient reserve day used.

(3) Upon exhaustion of the Medicare hospital inpatient coverage including the lifetime reserve days, coverage of 100 percent of the Medicare Part A eligible expenses for hospitalization paid at the appropriate Medicare standard of payment, subject to a lifetime maximum benefit of an additional 365 days. The provider shall accept the issuer’s payment as payment in full and may not bill the insured for any balance.

(4) Coverage under Medicare Parts A and B for the reasonable cost of the first three pints of blood, or equivalent quantities of packed red blood cells, as defined under federal regulations, unless replaced in accordance with federal regulations.

(5) Coverage for the coinsurance amount, or in the case of hospital outpatient department
 services, the copayment amount, of Medicare eligible expenses under Part B regardless of hospital confinement, subject to the Medicare Part B deductible.

(6) Coverage of the actual cost, up to the legally billed amount, of an annual mammogram as provided in Section 10123.81, to the extent not paid by Medicare.

(7) Coverage of the actual cost, up to the legally billed amount, of an annual cervical cancer screening test as provided in Section 10123.18, to the extent not paid by Medicare.

(c) The following additional benefits shall be included in Medicare supplement benefit plans B to J, inclusive, only as provided by Section 10192.9.

(1) With respect to the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for all of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible
 amount per benefit period.

(2) With respect to skilled nursing facility care, coverage for the actual billed charges up to the coinsurance amount from the 21st day to the 100th day, inclusive, in a Medicare benefit period for posthospital skilled nursing facility care eligible under Medicare Part A.

(3) With respect to the Medicare Part B deductible, coverage for all of the Medicare Part B deductible amount per calendar year regardless of hospital confinement.

(4) With respect to 80 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, coverage for 80 percent of the difference between the actual Medicare Part B charge as billed, not to exceed any charge limitation established by the Medicare Program or state law, and the Medicare-approved Part B charge. If the insurer limits payment to a limiting charge, the insurer has the
 burden to establish that amount as the legal limit.

(5) With respect to 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, coverage for all of the difference between the actual Medicare Part B charge as billed, not to exceed any charge limitation established by the Medicare Program or state law, and the Medicare-approved Part B charge. If the insurer limits payment to a limiting charge, the insurer has the burden to establish that amount as the legal limit.

(6) With respect to the basic outpatient prescription drug benefit, coverage for 50 percent of outpatient prescription drug charges, after a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) calendar year deductible, to a maximum of one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) in benefits received by the insured per calendar year, to the extent not covered by Medicare. On and after January 1, 2006, no Medicare supplement policy may be sold or
 issued if it includes a prescription drug benefit.

(7) With respect to the extended outpatient prescription drug benefit, coverage for 50 percent of outpatient prescription drug charges, after a two hundred fifty dollar ($250) calendar year deductible, to a maximum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) in benefits received by the insured per calendar year, to the extent not covered by Medicare. On and after January 1, 2006, no Medicare supplement policy may be sold or issued if it includes a prescription drug benefit.

(8) With respect to medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, coverage to the extent not covered by Medicare for 80 percent of the billed charges for Medicare-eligible expenses for medically necessary emergency hospital, physician, and medical care received in a foreign country, which care would have been covered by Medicare if provided in the United
 States and which care began during the first 60 consecutive days of each trip outside the United States, subject to a calendar year deductible of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and a lifetime maximum benefit of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). For purposes of this benefit, “emergency care” shall mean care needed immediately because of an injury or an illness of sudden and unexpected onset.

(9) With respect to the following, reimbursement shall be for the actual charges up to 100 percent of the Medicare-approved amount for each service, as if Medicare were to cover the service as identified in American Medical Association Current Procedural Terminology (AMA CPT) codes, up to a maximum of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) annually under this benefit, however, this benefit shall not include payment for any procedure covered by Medicare:

(A) An annual clinical preventive medical
 history and physical examination that may include tests and services from subparagraph (B) and patient education to address preventive health care measures.

(B) The following screening tests or preventive services that are not covered by Medicare, the selection and frequency of which are determined to be medically appropriate by the attending physician:

(i) Fecal occult blood test.

(ii) Mammogram.

(C) Influenza vaccine administered at any appropriate time during the year.

(10) With respect to the at-home recovery benefit, coverage for the actual charges up to forty dollars ($40) per visit and an annual maximum of one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) per year to provide short-term,
 at-home assistance with activities of daily living for those recovering from an illness, injury, or surgery.

(A) For purposes of this benefit, the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Activities of daily living” include, but are not limited to, bathing, dressing, personal hygiene, transferring, eating, ambulating, assistance with drugs that are normally self-administered, and changing bandages or other dressings.

(ii) “Care provider” means a duly qualified or licensed home health aide or homemaker, or a personal care aide or nurse provided through a licensed home health care agency or referred by a licensed referral agency or licensed nurses registry.

(iii) “Home” shall mean any place used by the insured as a place of residence, provided that the
 place would qualify as a residence for home health care services covered by Medicare. A hospital or skilled nursing facility shall not be considered the insured’s place of residence.

(iv) “At-home recovery visit” means the period of a visit required to provide at-home recovery care, without any limit on the duration of the visit, except that each consecutive four hours in a 24-hour period of services provided by a care provider is one visit.

(B) With respect to coverage requirements and limitations, the following shall apply:

(i) At-home recovery services provided shall be primarily services that assist in activities of daily living.

(ii) The insured’s attending physician shall certify that the specific type and frequency of at-home recovery services
 are necessary because of a condition for which a home care plan of treatment was approved by Medicare.

(iii) Coverage is limited to the following:

(I) No more than the number and type of at-home recovery visits certified as necessary by the insured’s attending physician. The total number of at-home recovery visits shall not exceed the number of Medicare-approved home health care visits under a Medicare-approved home care plan of treatment.

(II) The actual charges for each visit up to a maximum reimbursement of forty dollars ($40) per visit.

(III) One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) per calendar year.

(IV) Seven visits in any one week.

(V) Care furnished on a visiting basis in the insured’s home.

(VI) Services provided by a care provider as defined in subparagraph (A).

(VII) At-home recovery visits while the insured is covered under the policy or certificate and not otherwise excluded.

(VIII) At-home recovery visits received during the period the insured is receiving Medicare-approved home care services or no more than eight weeks after the service date of the last Medicare-approved home health care visit.

(C) Coverage is excluded for the following:

(i) Home care visits paid for by Medicare or other government programs.

(ii) Care provided by family members, unpaid volunteers, or providers who are not care providers.

(d) The standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan “K” shall consist of the following benefits:

(1) Coverage of 100 percent of the Medicare Part A hospital coinsurance amount for each day used from the 61st to the 90th day, inclusive, in any Medicare benefit period.

(2) Coverage of 100 percent of the Medicare Part A hospital coinsurance amount for each Medicare lifetime inpatient reserve day used from the 91st to the 150th day, inclusive, in any Medicare benefit period.

(3) Upon exhaustion of the Medicare hospital inpatient coverage, including the lifetime reserve days, coverage of 100 percent
 of the Medicare Part A eligible expenses for hospitalization paid at the applicable prospective payment system rate, or other appropriate Medicare standard of payment, subject to a lifetime maximum benefit of an additional 365 days. The provider shall accept the issuer’s payment for this benefit as payment in full and shall not bill the insured for any balance.

(4) With respect to the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for 50 percent of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible amount per benefit period until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (10) is met.

(5) With respect to skilled nursing facility care, coverage for 50 percent of the coinsurance amount for each day used from the 21st day to the 100th day, inclusive, in a Medicare benefit period for posthospital skilled nursing facility care eligible under Medicare Part A until the out-of-pocket
 limitation described in paragraph (10) is met.

(6) With respect to hospice care, coverage for 50 percent of cost sharing for all Medicare Part A eligible expenses and respite care until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (10) is met.

(7) Coverage for 50 percent, under Medicare Part A or B, of the reasonable cost of the first three pints of blood or equivalent quantities of packed red blood cells, as defined under federal regulations, unless replaced in accordance with federal regulations, until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (10) is met.

(8) Except for coverage provided in paragraph (9), coverage for 50 percent of the cost sharing otherwise applicable under Medicare Part B after the policyholder pays the Part B deductible, until the out-of-pocket limitation is met as described in
 paragraph (10).

(9) Coverage of 100 percent of the cost sharing for Medicare Part B preventive services, after the policyholder pays the Medicare Part B deductible.

(10) Coverage of 100 percent of all cost sharing under Medicare Parts A and B for the balance of the calendar year after the individual has reached the out-of-pocket limitation on annual expenditures under Medicare Parts A and B of four thousand dollars ($4,000) in 2006, indexed each year by the appropriate inflation adjustment specified by the secretary.

(e) The standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan “L” shall consist of the following benefits:

(1) The benefits described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (9) of subdivision (d).

(2) With respect to the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for 75 percent of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible amount per benefit period until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (8) is met.

(3) With respect to skilled nursing facility care, coverage for 75 percent of the coinsurance amount for each day used from the 21st day to the 100th day, inclusive, in a Medicare benefit period for posthospital skilled nursing facility care eligible under Medicare Part A until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (8) is met.

(4) With respect to hospice care, coverage for 75 percent of cost sharing for all Medicare Part A eligible expenses and respite care until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (8) is met.

(5) Coverage for 75 percent, under Medicare Part A or B, of the reasonable cost of the first three pints of blood or equivalent quantities of packed red blood cells, as defined under federal regulations, unless replaced in accordance with federal regulations, until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (8) is met.

(6) Except for coverage provided in paragraph (7), coverage for 75 percent of the cost sharing otherwise applicable under Medicare Part B after the policyholder pays the Part B deductible until the out-of-pocket limitation described in paragraph (8) is met.

(7) Coverage for 100 percent of the cost sharing for Medicare Part B preventive services after the policyholder pays the Part B deductible.

(8) Coverage of 100 percent of the cost sharing for Medicare Parts A and B for the
 balance of the calendar year after the individual has reached the out-of-pocket limitation on annual expenditures under Medicare Parts A and B of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in 2006, indexed each year by the appropriate inflation adjustment specified by the secretary.

(f) An issuer shall prominently indicate through text edits, or by other means acceptable to the commissioner, an amendment made to a Medicare supplement policy form that the department previously approved on the basis that the amendment is consistent with this section. The department may, in its discretion, restrict its review to amendments made to Medicare supplement policy forms that have not previously been found consistent with this section in order to facilitate the availability of amended policy forms that are consistent with the federal Medicare Modernization Act. The department shall not restrict its review if the amendment makes additional changes to the Medicare
 supplement policy form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 10, Sec. 17.   Effective July 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.81.

The following standards are applicable to all Medicare supplement policies or certificates delivered or issued for delivery in this state with an effective date on or after June 1, 2010. No policy or certificate may be advertised, solicited, delivered, or issued for delivery in this state as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate unless it complies with these benefit standards. No issuer may offer any 1990 standardized
 Medicare supplement benefit plan for sale with an effective date on or after June 1, 2010. Benefit standards applicable to Medicare supplement policies and certificates issued with an effective date prior to June 1, 2010, remain subject to the requirements of Section 10192.8.

(a) The following general standards apply to Medicare supplement policies and certificates and are in addition to all other requirements of this article:

(1) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not exclude or limit benefits for losses incurred more than six months from the effective date of coverage because it involved a preexisting condition. The policy or certificate shall not define a preexisting condition more restrictively than a condition for which medical advice was given or treatment was recommended by or received from a physician within six months before the effective date of
 coverage.

(2) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not indemnify against losses resulting from sickness on a different basis than losses resulting from accidents.

(3) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall provide that benefits designed to cover cost-sharing amounts under Medicare will be changed automatically to coincide with any changes in the applicable Medicare deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amounts. Premiums may be modified to correspond with those changes.

(4) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not provide for termination of coverage of a spouse solely because of the occurrence of an event specified for termination of coverage of the insured, other than the nonpayment of premium.

(5) Each Medicare
 supplement policy shall be guaranteed renewable.

(A) The issuer shall not cancel or nonrenew the policy solely on the ground of health status of the individual.

(B) The issuer shall not cancel or nonrenew the policy for any reason other than nonpayment of premium or material misrepresentation which is shown by the issuer to be material to the acceptance for coverage. The contestability period for Medicare supplement insurance shall be two years, pursuant to Section 10350.2.

(C) If the Medicare supplement policy is terminated by the master policyholder and is not replaced as provided under subparagraph (E), the issuer shall offer certificate holders an individual Medicare supplement policy which, at the option of the certificate holder, does one of the following:

(i) Provides for continuation of the benefits contained in the group policy.

(ii) Provides for benefits that otherwise meet the requirements of one of the standardized policies defined in this article.

(D) If an individual is a certificate holder in a group Medicare supplement policy and the individual terminates membership in the group, the issuer shall do one of the following:

(i) Offer the certificate holder the conversion opportunity described in subparagraph (C).

(ii) At the option of the group policyholder, offer the certificate holder continuation of coverage under the group policy.

(E) (i) If a group Medicare supplement policy is replaced by
 another group Medicare supplement policy purchased by the same policyholder, the issuer of the replacement policy shall offer coverage to all persons covered under the old group policy on its date of termination. Coverage under the new policy shall not result in any exclusion for preexisting conditions that would have been covered under the group policy being replaced.

(ii) If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another Medicare supplement policy or certificate that has been in force for six months or more, the replacing issuer shall not impose an exclusion or limitation based on a preexisting condition. If the original coverage has been in force for less than six months, the replacing issuer shall waive any time period applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods in the new policy or certificate to the extent the time was spent under the original coverage.

(6) Termination of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall be without prejudice to any continuous loss that commenced while the policy was in force, but the extension of benefits beyond the period during which the policy was in force may be predicated upon the continuous total disability of the insured, limited to the duration of the policy benefit period, if any, or payment of the maximum benefits. Receipt of Medicare Part D benefits shall not be considered in determining a continuous loss.

(7) (A) (i) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall provide that benefits and premiums under the policy or certificate shall be suspended at the request of the policyholder or certificate holder for the period, not to exceed 24 months, in which the policyholder or certificate holder has applied for and is determined to be entitled to
 medical assistance under Medi-Cal, but only if the policyholder or certificate holder notifies the issuer of the policy or certificate within 90 days after the date the individual becomes entitled to assistance. Upon receipt of timely notice, the insurer shall return directly to the insured that portion of the premium attributable to the period of Medi-Cal eligibility, subject to adjustment for paid claims.

(ii) If suspension occurs and if the policyholder or certificate holder loses entitlement to medical assistance under Medi-Cal, the policy or certificate shall be automatically reinstituted (effective as of the date of termination of entitlement) as of the termination of entitlement if the policyholder or certificate holder provides notice of loss of entitlement within 90 days after the date of loss and pays the premium attributable to the period, effective as of the date of termination of entitlement or equivalent coverage shall be provided
 if the prior form is no longer available.

(iii) Each Medicare supplement policy shall provide that benefits and premiums under the policy shall be suspended (for any period that may be provided by federal regulation) at the request of the policyholder if the policyholder is entitled to benefits under Section 226(b) of the federal Social Security Act and is covered under a group health plan (as defined in Section 1862(b)(1)(A)(v) of the federal Social Security Act). If suspension occurs and if the policyholder or certificate holder loses coverage under the group health plan, the policy shall be automatically reinstituted (effective as of the date of loss of coverage) if the policyholder provides notice of loss of coverage within 90 days after the date of the loss and pays the applicable premium.

(B) Reinstitution of coverages shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(i) Not provide for any waiting period with respect to treatment of preexisting conditions.

(ii) Provide for resumption of coverage that is substantially equivalent to coverage in effect before the date of suspension.

(iii) Provide for classification of premiums on terms at least as favorable to the policyholder or certificate holder as the premium classification terms that would have applied to the policyholder or certificate holder had the coverage not been suspended.

(8) A Medicare supplement policy shall not limit coverage exclusively to a single disease or affliction.

(9) A Medicare supplement policy shall provide an examination period of 30 days after the receipt of the policy by the
 applicant for purposes of review, during which time the applicant may return the policy as described in subdivision (e) of Section 10192.17.

(b) With respect to the standards for basic (core) benefits for benefit plans A, B, C, D, F, high deductible F, G, M, and N, every issuer of Medicare supplement insurance benefit plans shall make available a policy or certificate including only the following basic “core” package of benefits to each prospective insured. An issuer may make available to prospective insureds any of the other Medicare Supplement Insurance Benefit Plans in addition to the basic (core) package, but not in lieu of it. However, the benefits described in paragraphs (7) and (8) shall not be offered so long as California is required to disallow these benefits for Medicare beneficiaries by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other agent of the federal government under Section 1395ss of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(1) Coverage of Part A Medicare eligible expenses for hospitalization to the extent not covered by Medicare from the 61st day through the 90th day, inclusive, in any Medicare benefit period.

(2) Coverage of Part A Medicare eligible expenses incurred for hospitalization to the extent not covered by Medicare for each Medicare lifetime inpatient reserve day used.

(3) Upon exhaustion of the Medicare hospital inpatient coverage, including the lifetime reserve days, coverage of 100 percent of the Medicare Part A eligible expenses for hospitalization paid at the applicable prospective payment system (PPS) rate, or other appropriate Medicare standard of payment, subject to a lifetime maximum benefit of an additional 365 days. The provider shall accept the issuer’s payment as payment in full and may not bill the insured
 for any balance.

(4) Coverage under Medicare Parts A and B for the reasonable cost of the first three pints of blood, or equivalent quantities of packed red blood cells, as defined under federal regulations, unless replaced in accordance with federal regulations.

(5) Coverage for the coinsurance amount, or in the case of hospital outpatient department services paid under a prospective payment system, the copayment amount, of Medicare eligible expenses under Part B regardless of hospital confinement, subject to the Medicare Part B deductible.

(6) Coverage of cost sharing for all Part A Medicare eligible hospice care and respite care expenses.

(7) Coverage of the actual cost, up to the legally billed amount, of an annual mammogram as provided in Section
 10123.81, to the extent not paid by Medicare.

(8) Coverage of the actual cost, up to the legally billed amount, of an annual cervical cancer screening test as provided in Section 10123.18, to the extent not paid by Medicare.

(c) The following additional benefits shall be included in Medicare supplement benefit plans B, C, D, F, high deductible F, G, M, and N, consistent with the plan type and benefits for each plan as provided in Section 10192.91:

(1) With respect to the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for 100 percent of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible amount per benefit period.

(2) With respect to the Medicare Part A deductible, coverage for 50 percent of the Medicare Part A inpatient hospital deductible amount per benefit
 period.

(3) With respect to skilled nursing facility care, coverage for the actual billed charges up to the coinsurance amount from the 21st day through the 100th day in a Medicare benefit period for posthospital skilled nursing facility care eligible under Medicare Part A.

(4) With respect to the Medicare Part B deductible, coverage for 100 percent of the Medicare Part B deductible amount per calendar year regardless of hospital confinement.

(5) With respect to 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, coverage for all of the difference between the actual Medicare Part B charges as billed, not to exceed any charge limitation established by the Medicare Program or state law, and the Medicare-approved Part B charge.

(6) With respect to medically
 necessary emergency care in a foreign country, coverage to the extent not covered by Medicare for 80 percent of the billed charges for Medicare-eligible expenses for medically necessary emergency hospital, physician, and medical care received in a foreign country, which care would have been covered by Medicare if provided in the United States and which care began during the first 60 consecutive days of each trip outside the United States, subject to a calendar year deductible of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and a lifetime maximum benefit of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). For purposes of this benefit, “emergency care” shall mean care needed immediately because of an injury or an illness of sudden and unexpected onset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 146.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.9.

The following standards are applicable to all Medicare supplement policies or certificates delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 1992, and with an effective date prior to June 1, 2010.

(a) An issuer shall make available to each prospective policyholder and certificate holder a policy form or certificate form containing only the basic (core) benefits, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.8.

(b) No
 groups, packages, or combinations of Medicare supplement benefits other than those listed in this section shall be offered for sale in this state, except as may be permitted by subdivision (f) and by Section 10192.10.

(c) Benefit plans shall be uniform in structure, language, designation and format to the standard benefit plans A to L, inclusive, listed in subdivision (e), and shall conform to the definitions in Section 10192.4. Each benefit shall be structured in accordance with the format provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 10192.8 and list the benefits in the order listed in subdivision (e). For purposes of this section, “structure, language, and format” means style, arrangement, and overall content of a benefit.

(d) An issuer may use, in addition to the benefit plan designations required in subdivision (c), other designations to the extent permitted by
 law.

(e) With respect to the makeup of benefit plans, the following shall apply:

(1) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan A shall be limited to the basic (core) benefit common to all benefit plans, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10192.8.

(2) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan B shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8.

(3) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan C shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, Medicare Part B deductible, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3),
 and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively.

(4) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan D shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, and the at-home recovery benefit as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (8), and (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively.

(5) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan E shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, and preventive medical care as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (8), and (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively.

(6) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit
 plan F shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, the skilled nursing facility care, the Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively.

(7) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan F shall include only the following: 100 percent of covered expenses following the payment of the annual high deductible plan F deductible. The covered expenses include the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, the Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively. The
 annual high deductible plan F deductible shall consist of out-of-pocket expenses, other than premiums, for services covered by the Medicare supplement plan F policy, and shall be in addition to any other specific benefit deductibles. The annual high deductible Plan F deductible shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for 1998 and 1999, and shall be based on the calendar year, as adjusted annually thereafter by the secretary to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the 12-month period ending with August of the preceding year, and rounded to the nearest multiple of ten dollars ($10).

(8) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan G shall include only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, 80 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, and the at-home recovery benefit as
 defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (4), (8), and (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively.

(9) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan H shall consist of only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, basic outpatient prescription drug benefit, and medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (6), and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively. The outpatient prescription drug benefit shall not be included in a Medicare supplement policy sold on or after January 1, 2006.

(10) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan I shall consist of only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, basic outpatient prescription drug benefit, medically
 necessary emergency care in a foreign country, and at-home recovery benefit as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (5), (6), (8), and (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively. The outpatient prescription drug benefit shall not be included in a Medicare supplement policy sold on or after January 1, 2006.

(11) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan J shall consist of only the following: the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, extended outpatient prescription drug benefit, medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, preventive medical care, and at-home recovery benefit as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively. The outpatient prescription drug benefit shall not be included in a Medicare supplement policy sold on or
 after January 1, 2006.

(12) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit high deductible plan J shall consist of only the following: 100 percent of covered expenses following the payment of the annual high deductible plan J deductible. The covered expenses include the core benefit, plus the Medicare Part A deductible, skilled nursing facility care, Medicare Part B deductible, 100 percent of the Medicare Part B excess charges, extended outpatient prescription drug benefit, medically necessary emergency care in a foreign country, preventive medical care benefit, and at-home recovery benefit as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 10192.8, respectively. The annual high deductible plan J deductible shall consist of out-of-pocket expenses, other than premiums, for services covered by the Medicare supplement plan J policy, and shall be in addition to any other specific benefit deductibles. The
 annual deductible shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for 1998 and 1999, and shall be based on a calendar year, as adjusted annually thereafter by the secretary to reflect the change in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the 12-month period ending with August of the preceding year, and rounded to the nearest multiple of ten dollars ($10). The outpatient prescription drug benefit shall not be included in a Medicare supplement policy sold on or after January 1, 2006.

(13) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan K shall consist of only those benefits described in subdivision (d) of Section 10192.8.

(14) Standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan L shall consist of only those benefits described in subdivision (e) of Section 10192.8.

(f) An issuer may, with the prior approval of
 the commissioner, offer policies or certificates with new or innovative benefits in addition to the benefits provided in a policy or certificate that otherwise complies with the applicable standards. The new or innovative benefits may include benefits that are appropriate to Medicare supplement insurance, that are not otherwise available and that are cost-effective and offered in a manner that is consistent with the goal of simplification of Medicare supplement policies. On and after January 1, 2006, the innovative benefit shall not include an outpatient prescription drug benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 10, Sec. 19.   Effective July 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.91.
